Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Chapter 63. Registration of Sex Offenders.

Cross references. —

For inapplicability to certain offenders unconditionally discharged before July 1, 1984, from conviction for a single sex offense see § 12(a), ch. 41, SLA 1994 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For sex offender and child kidnapper registration, see 13 AAC 09.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 13, ch. 41, SLA 1994 provides that “[t]he Department of Public Safety shall uniformly enforce the provisions of this Act throughout the state regardless of the geographical location of the residence of the offender.”

Sec. 12.63.010.
Registration of sex offenders and related requirements.

A sex offender or child kidnapper who is physically present in the state shall register as provided in this section. The sex offender or child kidnapper shall register

within the 30-day period before release from an in-state correctional facility;

by the next working day following conviction for a sex offense or child kidnapping if the sex offender is not incarcerated at the time of conviction; or

by the next working day of becoming physically present in the state.

A sex offender or child kidnapper required to register under (a) of this section shall register with the Department of Corrections if the sex offender or child kidnapper is incarcerated or in person at the Alaska state trooper post or municipal police department located nearest to where the sex offender or child kidnapper resides at the time of registration. To fulfill the registration requirement, the sex offender or child kidnapper shall

complete a registration form that includes, at a minimum,

the sex offender’s or child kidnapper’s name, address, place of employment, and date of birth;

each conviction for a sex offense or child kidnapping for which the duty to register has not terminated under AS

12.63.020

, the date of the sex offense or child kidnapping convictions, the place and court of the sex offense or child kidnapping convictions, and whether the sex offender or child kidnapper has been unconditionally discharged from the conviction for a sex offense or child kidnapping and the date of the unconditional discharge; if the sex offender or child kidnapper asserts that the offender or kidnapper has been unconditionally discharged, the offender or kidnapper shall supply proof of that discharge acceptable to the department;

all aliases used;

the sex offender’s or child kidnapper’s driver’s license number;

the description, license numbers, and vehicle identification numbers of motor vehicles the sex offender or child kidnapper has access to, regardless of whether that access is regular or not;

any identifying features of the sex offender or child kidnapper;

anticipated changes of address;

a statement concerning whether the offender or kidnapper has had treatment for a mental abnormality or personality disorder since the date of conviction for an offense requiring registration under this chapter; and

each electronic mail address, instant messaging address, and other Internet communication identifier used by the sex offender or child kidnapper;

allow the Alaska state troopers, Department of Corrections, or municipal police to take a complete set of the sex offender’s or child kidnapper’s fingerprints and to take the sex offender’s or child kidnapper’s photograph.

If a sex offender or child kidnapper changes residence after having registered under (a) of this section, the sex offender or child kidnapper shall provide written notice of the change by the next working day following the change to the Alaska state trooper post or municipal police department located nearest to the new residence or, if the residence change is out of state, to the central registry. If a sex offender or child kidnapper establishes or changes an electronic mail address, instant messaging address, or other Internet communication identifier, the sex offender or child kidnapper shall, by the next working day, notify the department in writing of the changed or new address or identifier.

A sex offender or child kidnapper required to register

for 15 years under (a) of this section and AS

12.63.020

shall, annually, during the term of a duty to register under AS

12.63.020

, on a date set by the department at the time of the sex offender’s or child kidnapper’s initial registration, provide written verification to the department, in the manner required by the department, of the sex offender’s or child kidnapper’s address and notice of any changes to the information previously provided under (b)(1) of this section;

for life under (a) of this section and AS 12.63.020 shall, not less than quarterly, on a date set by the department, provide written verification to the department, in the manner required by the department, of the sex offender’s or child kidnapper’s address and any changes to the information previously provided under (b)(1) of this section.

The registration form required to be submitted under (b) of this section and the annual or quarterly verifications must be sworn to by the offender or kidnapper and contain an admonition that a false statement shall subject the offender or kidnapper to prosecution for perjury.

In this section, “correctional facility” has the meaning given in AS

33.30.901

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 41 SLA 1994; am §§ 7 — 11 ch 106 SLA 1998; am §§ 3, 4 ch 42 SLA 2008; am § 82 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (e) was enacted as (f). Relettered in 1998, at which time former subsection (e) was relettered as (f).

Cross references. —

For provisions criminalizing failure to register, see AS

11.56.835

and

11.56.840

.

Administrative Code. —

For sex offender and child kidnapper registration, see 13 AAC 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, substituted “AS

12.63.020

” for “AS

12.63.020

(a)(2)” in (d)(1) and for “AS

12.63.020(a)(1)

” in (d)(2).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 142(c), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments to (d) of this section apply “to the duty to register as a sex offender for offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 12.63.020.
Duration of sex offender or child kidnapper duty to register.

The duty of a sex offender or child kidnapper to comply with the requirements of AS

12.63.010

is as follows:

for a sex offender or child kidnapper, as that term is defined in AS

12.63.100

(6)(A), for each sex offense or child kidnapping, the duty

continues for the lifetime of a sex offender or child kidnapper convicted of

one aggravated sex offense; or

two or more sex offenses, two or more child kidnappings, or one sex offense and one child kidnapping; for purposes of this section, a person convicted of indecent exposure before a person under 16 years of age under AS

11.41.460

more than two times has been convicted of two or more sex offenses;

ends 15 years following the sex offender’s or child kidnapper’s unconditional discharge from a conviction for a single sex offense that is not an aggravated sex offense or for a single child kidnapping if the sex offender or child kidnapper has supplied proof that is acceptable to the department of the unconditional discharge; the registration period under this subparagraph

is tolled for each year that a sex offender or child kidnapper fails to comply with the requirements of this chapter or is incarcerated for the offense or kidnapping for which the offender or kidnapper is required to register or for any other offense;

may include the time a sex offender or child kidnapper was absent from this state if the sex offender or child kidnapper has complied with any sex offender or child kidnapper registration requirements of the jurisdiction in which the offender or kidnapper was located and if the sex offender or child kidnapper provides the department with proof of the compliance while the sex offender or child kidnapper was absent from this state; and

continues for a sex offender or child kidnapper who has not supplied proof acceptable to the department of the offender’s or kidnapper’s unconditional discharge for the sex offense or child kidnapping requiring registration;

for a sex offender or child kidnapper, as that term is defined in AS

12.63.100

(6)(B), the duty continues for the period determined by the department under (b) of this section.

The department shall adopt, by regulation,

procedures to notify a sex offender or child kidnapper

who, on the registration form under AS

12.63.010

, lists a conviction for a sex offense or child kidnapping that is a violation of a former law of this state or a law of another jurisdiction, of the duration of the offender’s or kidnapper’s duty under (a) of this section for that sex offense or child kidnapping;

as that term is defined in AS

12.63.100

(6)(B), of the duration of the sex offender or child kidnapper’s duty under (a) of this section; in adopting regulations under this subparagraph, the department shall

consider the period of registration required in the other jurisdiction; and

provide for tolling of the registration period if the sex offender or child kidnapper fails to comply with the requirements of this chapter or is incarcerated;

a requirement that an offender or kidnapper supply proof acceptable to the department of unconditional discharge and the date it occurred.

History.

(§ 4 ch 41 SLA 1994; am § 15 ch 81 SLA 1998; am § 12 ch 106 SLA 1998; am § 83 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For applicability provisions relating to the duration of registration requirements of subsection (a), see §§ 17(b) and 18(b), ch. 54, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For sex offender and child kidnapper registration, see 13 AAC 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (a), substituted “AS

12.63.010

is as follows:

“(1) for a sex offender or child kidnapper, as that term is defined in AS

12.63.100

(6)(A), for each sex offense or child kidnapping, the duty” for “AS

12.63.010

for each sex offense or child kidnapping” at the end of the introductory paragraph, redesignated former (a)(1) as (a)(1)(A), (a)(1)(A) as
(a)(1)(A)(i), (a)(1)(B) as (a)(1)(A)(ii), (a)(2) as (a)(1)(B),
(a)(2)(A) as (a)(1)(B)(i), (a)(2)(B) as (a)(1)(B)(ii) and (a)(2)(C) as (a)(1)(B)(iii),
inserted “subparagraph” at the end of (a)(1)(B),
deleted “paragraph” at the beginning of (a)(1)(B)(i), deleted former (a)(2)(A)(i) and (a)(2)(A)(ii) designations, inserted “or” following “chapter” in (a)(1)(B)(i), added (a)(2), and made related stylistic changes; rewrote (b), which read, “The department shall adopt, by regulation, procedures to notify a sex offender or child kidnapper who, on the registration form under AS

12.63.010

, lists a conviction for a sex offense or child kidnapping that is a violation of a former law of this state or a law of another jurisdiction, of the duration of the offender’s or kidnapper’s duty under (a) of this section for that sex offense or child kidnapping. As a part of the regulations, the department shall require the offender or kidnapper to supply proof acceptable to the department of unconditional discharge and the date it occurred.”

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(c), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments to this section apply “to the duty to register as a sex offender for offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 12.63.030.
Notification of other jurisdictions.

If a sex offender or child kidnapper notifies the department that the sex offender or child kidnapper is moving from the state, the department shall notify the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the state where the sex offender or child kidnapper is moving of the sex offender’s or child kidnapper’s intended address.

If a sex offender or child kidnapper fails to register or to verify the sex offender’s or child kidnapper’s address and registration under this chapter, or the department does not know the location of a sex offender or child kidnapper required to register under this chapter, the department shall immediately notify the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 106 SLA 1998)

Sec. 12.63.100.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“aggravated sex offense” means

a crime under AS

11.41.100(a)(3)

, or a similar law of another jurisdiction, in which the person committed or attempted to commit a sexual offense, or a similar offense under the laws of the other jurisdiction; in this subparagraph, “sexual offense” has the meaning given in AS

11.41.100(a)(3)

;

a crime under AS

11.41.110(a)(3)

, or a similar law of another jurisdiction, in which the person committed or attempted to commit one of the following crimes, or a similar law of another jurisdiction:

sexual assault in the first degree;

sexual assault in the second degree;

sexual abuse of a minor in the first degree; or

sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree;

a crime, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a crime, under AS

11.41.410

,

11.41.434

, or a similar law of another jurisdiction or a similar provision under a former law of this state; or

an offense, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit an offense, under

AS

26.05.890

, or a similar law of another jurisdiction, if the person engaged in or attempted to engage in sexual penetration; or

AS

26.05.893

, or a similar law of another jurisdiction, if the prohibited sexual activity in which the member of the militia engaged or attempted to engage is sexual penetration;

“child kidnapping” means

a crime under AS

11.41.100(a)(3)

, or a similar law of another jurisdiction, in which the person committed or attempted to commit kidnapping;

a crime under AS

11.41.110(a)(3)

, or a similar law of another jurisdiction, in which the person committed or attempted to commit kidnapping if the victim was under 18 years of age at the time of the offense;

a crime, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a crime, under AS

11.41.300

, or a similar law of another jurisdiction or a similar provision under a former law of this state, if the victim was under 18 years of age at the time of the offense; or

an offense, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit an offense, under AS

26.05.935(b)

, or a similar law of another jurisdiction, if the

member of the militia commits the enumerated offense of kidnapping, punishable under Article 134, 10 U.S.C. 934 (Uniform Code of Military Justice); and

victim was under 18 years of age at the time of the offense;

“conviction” means that an adult, or a juvenile charged as an adult under AS 47.12 or a similar procedure in another jurisdiction, has entered a plea of guilty, guilty but mentally ill, or nolo contendere, or has been found guilty or guilty but mentally ill by a court or jury, of a sex offense or child kidnapping regardless of whether the judgment was set aside under AS

12.55.085

or a similar procedure in another jurisdiction or was the subject of a pardon or other executive clemency; “conviction” does not include a judgment that has been reversed or vacated by a court;

“department” means the Department of Public Safety;

“sexual contact” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“sex offender or child kidnapper” means

a person convicted of a sex offense or child kidnapping in this state or another jurisdiction regardless of whether the conviction occurred before, after, or on January 1, 1999; or

a person charged and convicted as an adult of an offense that requires registration as a sex offender or child kidnapper in another jurisdiction;

“sex offense” means

a crime under AS

11.41.100(a)(3)

, or a similar law of another jurisdiction, in which the person committed or attempted to commit a sexual offense, or a similar offense under the laws of the other jurisdiction; in this subparagraph, “sexual offense” has the meaning given in AS

11.41.100(a)(3)

;

a crime under AS

11.41.110(a)(3)

, or a similar law of another jurisdiction, in which the person committed or attempted to commit one of the following crimes, or a similar law of another jurisdiction:

sexual assault in the first degree;

sexual assault in the second degree;

sexual abuse of a minor in the first degree; or

sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree;

a crime, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a crime, under the following statutes or a similar law of another jurisdiction:

AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.438

;

AS

11.41.440(a)(2)

;

AS

11.41.450

—

11.41.458

;

AS

11.41.460

or AS

26.05.900

(c) if the indecent exposure is before a person under 16 years of age and the offender has previously been convicted under AS

11.41.460

or AS

26.05.900

(c);

AS

11.61.125

—

11.61.128

;

AS

11.66.110

,

11.66.130(a)(2)(B)

, or AS

26.05.900(b)

if the person who was induced or caused to engage in prostitution was under 20 years of age at the time of the offense;

former AS 11.15.120, former 11.15.134, or assault with the intent to commit rape under former AS 11.15.160, former AS 11.40.110, or former 11.40.200;

AS

11.61.118(a)(2)

if the offender has a previous conviction for that offense;

AS

11.66.100(a)(2)

if the offender is subject to punishment under AS

11.66.100(e)

;

AS

26.05.890

if the person engaged in sexual penetration or sexual contact with the victim;

AS

26.05.890

if, at the time of the offense, the victim is under a duty to obey the lawful orders of the offender, regardless of whether the offender is in the direct chain of command over the victim;

AS

26.05.893

if the person engaged in sexual penetration or sexual contact with the victim;

AS

26.05.900(a)(1)

— (4) if the victim is under 18 years of age at the time of the offense;

AS 26.05.900 if, at the time of the offense, the victim is under a duty to obey the lawful orders of the offender, regardless of whether the offender is in the direct chain of command over the victim; or

AS

11.61.123

if the offender is subject to punishment under AS

11.61.123(f)(1)

or (2);

an offense, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit an offense, under AS

26.05.935(b)

, or a similar law of another jurisdiction, if the member of the militia commits one of the following enumerated offenses punishable under Article 134, 10 U.S.C. 934 (Uniform Code of Military Justice):

child pornography; or

pandering and prostitution if the person who is induced, enticed, caused, or procured to engage in a sexual act is under 20 years of age at the time of the offense; or

an offense in which the person is required to register as a sex offender under the laws of another jurisdiction;

“sexual penetration” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“unconditional discharge” has the meaning given in AS

12.55.185

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 41 SLA 1994; am § 16 ch 81 SLA 1998; am §§ 14 — 16 ch 106 SLA 1998; am §§ 12 — 15 ch 54 SLA 1999; am §§ 8, 9 ch 14 SLA 2006; am § 24 ch 24 SLA 2007; am § 18 ch 18 SLA 2010; am § 25 ch 43 SLA 2013; am § 39 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 85 SLA 2018; am §§
84, 85 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Paragraphs were renumbered in 1998 and again in 1999 to maintain alphabetical order.

Paragraphs (5) and (8) were enacted as (8) and (9); renumbered in 2018 for alphabetical consistency, at which time other paragraphs were also renumbered.

Cross references. —

For applicability provisions relating to the 1999 amendments of paragraphs (1), (2), and (6) (earlier designated as (5)), see § 17, ch. 54, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary and Special Acts.
For provisions relating to legislative purpose and applicability of the 1999 enactment of paragraph (3) (enacted in 1999 as (7)), see §§ 1 and 18, ch. 54, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary and Special Acts.

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 43, SLA 2013 (SB 22), see 2013 Senate Journal 38 — 39.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2018 changes to this section, see sec. 42(b), ch. 85, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

For a statement of legislative intent regarding the 2019 amendment to paragraph (7) of this section, see § 1, ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, in the 2019 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, added (6)(C)(viii) and made related changes.

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (6)(C)(vi) substituted “was under 20 years of age” for “was 16 or 17 years of age”; added (6)(C)(ix).

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (6)(C)(vi), substituted “11.66.130(a)(2)(B)” for “11.66.130(a)(2)”.

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (1)(D); added (2)(D); in (6) [now 7], in (6)(C)(iv) [now (7)(C)(iv)], inserted “or AS

26.05.900(c)

” following “AS

11.41.460

” at the beginning, and substituted “previously been convicted under AS

11.41.460

or AS

26.05.900(c)

” for “a previous conviction for that offense”, in (6)(C)(vi) [now (7)(C)(vi)], inserted “, or AS

26.05.900(b)

” preceding “if the person”, and made related changes, added (6)(C)(x) — (xiv) [now (7) (C)(x) — (xiv), added (6)(D) [now (7)(D); added (8) [now (5)] and (9) [now (8)].

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, added (6)(B), (7)(C)(xv), (7)(E), and made related stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

Section 21(a), ch. 18, SLA 2010, provides that the 2010 enactment of (6)(C)(viii) of this section applies to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2010.

Under sec. 46(a), ch. 43, SLA 2013, the 2013 changes to paragraph (6) apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2013.

Section 142(c), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments to paragraphs (6) and (7) of this section apply “to the duty to register as a sex offender for offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”